Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 9. Special Provisions Relating to Distribution.

Sec. 13.16.535.
Successors’ rights if no administration.

In the absence of administration, the heirs and devisees are entitled to the estate in accordance with the terms of a probated will or the laws of intestate succession.
Devisees may establish title by the probated will to devised property. Persons entitled to property by homestead allowance, exemption, or intestacy may establish title to it by proof of the decedent’s ownership, death, and their relationship to the decedent.
Successors take subject to all charges incident to administration, including the claims of creditors and allowances of surviving spouse and dependent children, and subject to the rights of others resulting from abatement, retainer, advancement, and ademption.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.540.
Distribution; order in which assets appropriated; abatement.

Except as provided in (b) of this section and except as provided in connection with the share of the surviving spouse who elects to take an elective share, shares of distributees abate, without any preference or priority as between real and personal property, in the following order: (1) property not disposed of by the will; (2) residuary devises; (3) general devises; (4) specific devises. For purposes of abatement, a general devise charged on any specific property or fund is a specific devise to the extent of the value of the property on which it is charged, and upon the failure or insufficiency of the property on which it is charged, a general devise to the extent of the failure or insufficiency. Abatement within each classification is in proportion to the amounts of property each of the beneficiaries would have received if full distribution of the property had been made in accordance with the terms of the will.

If the will expresses an order of abatement, or if the testamentary plan or the express or implied purpose of the devise would be defeated by the order of abatement stated in (a) of this section, the shares of the distributees abate as may be found necessary to give effect to the intention of the testator.

If the subject of a preferred devise is sold or used incident to administration, abatement shall be achieved by appropriate adjustments in, or contribution from, other interests in the remaining assets.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.545.
Right of retainer.

The amount of a noncontingent indebtedness of a successor to the estate if due, or its present value if not due, shall be offset against the successor’s interest; but the successor has the benefit of any defense that would be available to the successor in a direct proceeding for recovery of the debt.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Collateral references. —

31 Am. Jur. 2d, Executors and Administrators, §§ 398, 996 et seq.

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partition, §§ 46, 47, 103-105.

Personal representative’s right of retainer or setoff, against debtor’s distributive share of estate, of debt barred by statute of limitations. 39 ALR2d 675.

Sec. 13.16.550.
Interest on general pecuniary devise. [Repealed, § 4 ch 145 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 13.16.555.
Penalty clause for contest.

A provision in a will purporting to penalize any interested person for contesting the will or instituting other proceedings relating to the estate is unenforceable if probable cause exists for instituting proceedings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.560.
Distribution in kind; valuation; method.

Unless a contrary intention is indicated by the will, the distributable assets of a decedent’s estate shall be distributed in kind to the extent possible through application of the following provisions:

a specific devisee is entitled to distribution of the thing devised, and a spouse or child who has selected particular assets of an estate as provided in AS

13.12.402

—

13.12.405

shall receive the items selected;

a homestead or family allowance or devise payable in money may be satisfied by value in kind if

the person entitled to the payment has not demanded payment in cash;

the property distributed in kind is valued at fair market value as of the date of its distribution; and

no residuary devisee has requested that the asset in question remain a part of the residue of the estate;

for the purpose of valuation under (2) of this subsection, securities regularly traded on recognized exchanges, if distributed in kind, are valued at the price for the last sale of like securities traded on the business day before distribution or, if there was no sale on that day, at the median between amounts bid and offered at the close of that day; assets consisting of sums owed the decedent or the estate by solvent debtors as to which there is no known dispute or defense are valued at the sum due with accrued interest or discounted to the date of distribution; for assets that do not have readily ascertainable values, a valuation as of a date not more than 30 days before the date of distribution, if otherwise reasonable, controls; for purposes of facilitating distribution, the personal representative may ascertain the value of the assets as of the time of the proposed distribution in any reasonable way, including the employment of qualified appraisers, even if the assets may have been previously appraised;

the residuary estate shall be distributed in any equitable manner, including distribution in kind, in cash, partially in kind, partially in cash, in divided interests, in undivided interests, pro rata among all the distributees, or by a method other than pro rata among all distributees; distribution under this paragraph may be made without regard to the income tax basis or other special tax attributes of the assets; a distribution under this paragraph may be made in whatever manner the personal representative finds to be the most practicable and in the best interests of the distributees.

After the probable charges against the estate are known, the personal representative may mail or deliver a proposal for distribution to all persons who have a right to object to the proposed distribution. The right of any distributee to object to the proposed distribution on the basis of the kind or value of asset to be received by the distributee, if not waived earlier in writing, terminates if the distributee fails to object in writing received by the personal representative within 30 days after mailing or delivery of the proposal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 9 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 5 ch 40 SLA 2000)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 19, ch. 75, SLA 1996, provides, in regard to the amendment of subsection (a) by § 9, ch. 75, SLA 1996, as follows: “(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section or in this Act,

“(1) this Act applies to the governing instruments executed by decedents dying on or after January 1, 1997;

“(2) this Act applies to a proceeding in court pending on or begun on or after January 1, 1997, regardless of the time of the death of the decedent, except to the extent that in the opinion of the court the former procedure should be made applicable in a particular case in the interest of justice or because of the infeasibility of applying the procedures of this Act;

“(3) an act done before January 1, 1997, in any proceeding and an accrued right are not impaired by this Act; if a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period of time that began to run under a statute before January 1, 1997, the provisions of the statute apply to that right on and after January 1, 1997;

“(4) a rule of construction or presumption provided in this Act, applies to governing instruments executed before January 1, 1997, unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent.

“(b) AS

13.33.301

,

13.33.302

,

13.33.303

,

13.33.304

,

13.33.305

,

13.33.306

,

13.33.307

,

13.33.308

,

13.33.309

, and

13.33.310

, enacted by sec. 12 of this Act, apply to registrations of securities in beneficiary form made before, on, or after January 1, 1997, by decedents dying on or after January 1, 1997.

“(c) In this section, ‘court,’ ‘governing instrument,’ and ‘proceeding’ have the meanings given in AS

13.06.050

, amended by sec. 2 of this Act.”

Sec. 13.16.565.
Distribution in kind; evidence.

If distribution in kind is made, the personal representative shall execute an instrument or deed of distribution assigning, transferring, or releasing the assets to the distributee as evidence of the distributee’s title to the property.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.570.
Distribution; right or title of distributee.

Proof that a distributee has received an instrument or deed of distribution of assets in kind, or payment in distribution, from a personal representative, is conclusive evidence that the distributee has succeeded to the interest of the estate in the distributed assets, as against all persons interested in the estate, except that the personal representative may recover the assets or their value if the distribution was improper.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.575.
Improper distribution; liability of distributee.

Unless the distribution or payment no longer can be questioned because of adjudication, estoppel, or limitation, a distributee of property improperly distributed or paid, or a claimant who was improperly paid, is liable to return the property improperly received and its income since distribution if the distributee or claimant has the property.
If the distributee or claimant does not have the property, then the distributee or claimant is liable to return the value as of the date of disposition of the property improperly received and its income and gain.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.580.
Purchasers from distributees protected.

If property distributed in kind or a security interest in it is acquired for value by a purchaser from or lender to a distributee who has received an instrument or deed of distribution from the personal representative, the purchaser or lender takes title free of rights of any interested person in the estate and incurs no personal liability to the estate, or to any interested person, whether or not the distribution was proper or supported by court order and whether or not the authority of the personal representative was terminated before execution of the instrument or deed. This section protects a purchaser from or lender to a distributee who, as personal representative, executed the deed of distribution, as well as a purchaser from or lender to any other distributee or transferee of a distributee. To be protected under this provision, a purchaser or lender need not inquire whether a personal representative acted properly in making the distribution in kind, even if the personal representative and the distributee are the same person, or whether the authority of the personal representative had terminated before the distribution. Any instrument described in this section that is recorded under AS 40.17 or filed under former AS 45.09 or under AS 45.29 and that bears a notation of that recordation or filing is prima facie evidence that the transfer described in it was made for value.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 17 ch 154 SLA 1976; am § 22 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 23 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Sec. 13.16.585.
Partition for purpose of distribution.

When two or more heirs or devisees are entitled to distribution of undivided interests in any real or personal property of the estate, the personal representative or one or more of the heirs or devisees may petition the court before the formal or informal closing of the estate, to make partition.
After notice to the interested heirs or devisees, the court shall partition the property in the same manner as provided by the law for civil actions of partition.
The court may direct the personal representative to sell any property that cannot be partitioned without prejudice to the owners and that cannot conveniently be allotted to any one party.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.590.
Private agreements among successors to decedent binding on personal representative.

Subject to the rights of creditors and taxing authorities, competent successors may agree among themselves to alter the interests, shares, or amounts to which they are entitled under the will of the decedent, or under the laws of intestacy, in any way that they provide in a written contract executed by all who are affected by its provisions.
The personal representative shall abide by the terms of the agreement subject to the obligation to administer the estate for the benefit of creditors, to pay all taxes and costs of administration, and to carry out the responsibilities of office for the benefit of any successors of the decedent who are not parties.
Personal representatives of decedents’ estates are not required to see to the performance of trusts if the trustee thereof is another person who is willing to accept the trust. Accordingly, trustees of a testamentary trust are successors for the purposes of this section. Nothing in this section relieves trustees of any duties owed to beneficiaries of trusts.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.595.
Distributions to trustee.

Before distributing to a trustee, the personal representative may require that the trust be registered if the state in which it is to be administered provides for registration and that the trustee inform the beneficiaries as provided in AS

13.36.080

.

If the trust instrument does not excuse the trustee from giving bond, the personal representative may petition the appropriate court to require that the trustee post bond if the personal representative apprehends that distribution might jeopardize the interests of persons who are not able to protect themselves, and the personal representative may withhold distribution until the court has acted.

No inference of negligence on the part of the personal representative shall be drawn from failure to exercise the authority conferred by (a) and (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.600.
Disposition of unclaimed assets.

If an heir, devisee, or claimant cannot be found, the personal representative shall distribute the share of personal property of the missing person to the person’s conservator, or if the person has no conservator to the Department of Revenue to be deposited in the general fund as required by AS

34.45.370

. Property distributable to the Department of Revenue under this subsection is subject to AS

34.45.280

—

34.45.780

. If notice to the heir, devisee, or claimant, substantially equivalent to that required by AS

34.45.310

, has been given by the personal representative or other person, AS

34.45.310

does not apply.

Real property distributable to a missing heir, devisee, or claimant shall be distributed first to the conservator of the heir, devisee, or claimant; if the heir, devisee, or claimant has no conservator, the real property passes to the state. Real property reported under this subsection is subject to AS

38.95.200

—

38.95.270

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am §§ 7, 8 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 13.16.605.
Distribution to person under disability.

A personal representative may discharge the obligation to distribute to any person under legal disability by distributing to the person’s conservator, or any other person authorized by AS 13.06
—
AS 13.36 or otherwise to give a valid receipt and discharge for the distribution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.610.
Apportionment of estate taxes.

Unless the will provides otherwise, the tax shall be apportioned among all persons interested in the estate. The apportionment is to be made in the proportion that the value of the interest of each person interested in the estate bears to the total value of the interests of all persons interested in the estate. The values used in determining the tax are to be used for that purpose. If the decedent’s will directs a method of apportionment of tax different from the method described in AS 13.06 — AS 13.36, the method described in the will controls.

The court in which venue lies for the administration of the estate of a decedent, on petition for the purpose, may determine the apportionment of the tax.

If the court finds that it is inequitable to apportion interest and penalties in the manner provided in (a) of this section, because of special circumstances, it may direct apportionment of them in the manner it finds equitable.

If the court finds that the assessment of penalties and interest assessed in relation to the tax is due to delay caused by the negligence of the fiduciary, the court may charge the fiduciary with the amount of the assessed penalties and interest.

In any action to recover from any person interested in the estate the amount of the tax apportioned to the person in accordance with AS 13.06 — AS 13.36, the determination of the court in respect thereto shall be prima facie correct.

The personal representative or other person in possession of the property of the decedent required to pay the tax may withhold from any property distributable to any person interested in the estate, upon its distribution, the amount of tax attributable to the distributee’s interest. If the property in possession of the personal representative or other person required to pay the tax and distributable to any person interested in the estate is insufficient to satisfy the proportionate amount of the tax determined to be due from the person, the personal representative or other person required to pay the tax may recover the deficiency from the person interested in the estate. If the property is not in the possession of the personal representative or the other person required to pay the tax, the personal representative or the other person required to pay the tax may recover from any person interested in the estate the amount of the tax apportioned to the person in accordance with this chapter.

If property held by the personal representative is distributed before final apportionment of the tax, the distributee shall provide a bond or other security for the apportionment liability in the form and amount prescribed by the personal representative.

In making an apportionment, allowances shall be made for any exemptions granted, for any classification made of persons interested in the estate, and for any deductions and credits allowed by the law imposing the tax.

Any exemption or deduction allowed by reason of the relationship of any person to the decedent or by reason of the purposes of the gift inures to the benefit of the person bearing the relationship or receiving the gift; but if an interest is subject to a prior present interest that is not allowable as a deduction, the tax apportionable against the present interest shall be paid from principal.

Any deduction for property previously taxed and any credit for gift taxes or death taxes of a foreign country paid by the decedent or the decedent’s estate inures to the proportionate benefit of all persons liable to apportionment.

Any credit for inheritance, succession, or estate taxes, or taxes in the nature thereof applicable to property or interests includable in the estate, inures to the benefit of the persons or interests chargeable with the payment thereof to the extent proportionately that the credit reduces the tax.

To the extent that property passing to or in trust for a surviving spouse or any charitable, public, or similar gift or devisee is not an allowable deduction for purposes of the tax solely by reason of an inheritance tax or other death tax imposed upon and deductible from the property, the property is not included in the computation provided for in (a) of this section, and to that extent no apportionment is made against the property. This subsection does not apply to any case if the result would be to deprive the estate of a deduction otherwise allowable under Section 2053(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, of the United States, relating to deduction for state death taxes on transfers for public, charitable, or religious uses.

No interest in income and no estate for years or for life or other temporary interest in any property or fund is subject to apportionment as between the temporary interest and the remainder. The tax on the temporary interest and the tax, if any, on the remainder is chargeable against the corpus of the property or funds subject to the temporary interest and remainder.

Neither the personal representative nor other person required to pay the tax is under any duty to institute any action to recover from any person interested in the estate the amount of the tax apportioned to the person until the expiration of the three months next following final determination of the tax. A personal representative or other person required to pay the tax who institutes the action within a reasonable time after the three-month period is not subject to any liability or surcharge because any portion of the tax apportioned to any person interested in the estate was collectable at a time following the death of the decedent but thereafter became uncollectable. If the personal representative or other person required to pay the tax cannot collect from any person interested in the estate the amount of the tax apportioned to the person, the amount not recoverable shall be equitably apportioned among the other persons interested in the estate who are subject to apportionment.

A personal representative acting in another state or a person required to pay the tax domiciled in another state may institute an action in the courts of this state and may recover a proportionate amount of the federal estate tax, of an estate tax payable to another state or of a death duty due by a decedent’s estate to another state, from a person interested in the estate who is either domiciled in this state or who owns property in this state subject to attachment or execution. For the purposes of the action the determination of apportionment by the court having jurisdiction of the administration of the decedent’s estate in the other state is prima facie correct.

In this section,

“estate” means the gross estate of a decedent as determined for the purpose of federal estate tax and the estate tax payable to this state;

“fiduciary” means personal representative or trustee;

“person” means any individual, partnership, association, joint stock company, corporation, government, political subdivision, governmental agency, or local governmental agency;

“person interested in the estate” means any person entitled to receive, or who has received, from a decedent or by reason of the death of a decedent any property or interest in the property included in the decedent’s estate; it includes a personal representative, conservator, and trustee;

“state” means any state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico;

“tax” means the federal estate tax and the additional inheritance tax imposed by AS 43.31 and interest and penalties imposed in addition to the tax.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 17 ch 56 SLA 1973)

Revisor’s notes. —

Former subsection (a) of this section was redesignated (p) and reorganized in 1985 to alphabetize the defined terms. Former subsections (b)-(p) were redesignated as (a)-(o).